<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89131-0044 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-31-89.f2.A1043</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of Child Support Enforcement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">45 CFR Part 305</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52"> Child Support Enforcement Program Audit </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE), HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>OCSE is proposing to amend the Child Support Enforcementprogram regulations governing the audit of State Child Support Enforcement(IV-D) Programs and the imposition of financial penalties for failure tosubstantially comply with the requirements of title IV-D of the SocialSecurity Act (the Act). This proposal would improve and expedite the currentprocess for auditing State and local IV-D programs by consolidating thecriteria evaluated during the course of an audit and making other changesto the current requirements to allow flexibility in the audit approach.These changes are being proposed in order to simplify the current auditprocess by incorporating lessons learned since promulgation of the existingaudit regulations, to ensure the initiation of audits as close as possibleto the time period audited, and to shorten the elapsed time from auditinitiation to issuance of a final report. For a detailed discussion ofthe changes, see <T2>Supplementary Information</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Consideration will be given to written comments and suggestionsreceived by April 3, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Address comments to: Associate Deputy Director, Officeof Child Support Enforcement, Department of Health and Human Services,370 L'Enfant Promenade, SW., Washington, DC 20447. Comments will be availablefor public inspection Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. inthe Department's office at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Betsy Matheson, (202) 252-5362.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>As a result of the enactment of Pub. L. 98-378, the ``Child Support EnforcementAmendments of 1984,'' OCSE published final audit regulations on October1, 1985, which affect the audits of State IV-D programs for FY 1984 andbeyond. Section 9 of Pub. L. 98-378, and the implementing regulations,require that OCSE conduct an audit of the effectiveness of State ChildSupport Enforcement programs at least once every three years; require thatOCSE use a substantial compliance standard to determine whether each Statehas an effective IV-D program; provide that any State found not to havean effective IV-D program in substantial compliance with the requirementsof title IV-D of the Act be given an opportunity to take the correctiveaction necessary to achieve substantial compliance with those requirements;provide for the use of a graduated penalty of not less than l nor morethan 5 percent of a State's Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC)program funds if a State is not in substantial compliance; and specifythe period of time during which a penalty is effective. In order to be found to have an effective program in substantial compliancewith the requirements of title IV-D of the Act, a State must meet the Stateplan requirements contained in 45 CFR Part 302. Under current regulations,there are separate audit criteria for each of the State plan requirements.The current regulations list 30 criteria (which include numerous relatedsubcriteria) governing procedural requirements relating to the administrationof the IV-D program which are evaluated to determine compliance with theState plan requirements. These procedural criteria must be fully met fora finding of substantial compliance. In addition, the regulations list26 functional, or service-related, criteria which include numerous relatedsubcriteria for purposes of evaluating State performance. The required procedures under these service-related criteria must be usedin 75 percent of the cases reviewed for the State's program to be foundin substantial compliance. In accordance with the statute, a State's failureto fully comply with any of the audit criteria will result in a findingthat the State failed to substantially comply with title IV-D requirementsunless such finding is of a technical nature which does not adversely affectthe performance of the State IV-D program. OCSE auditors have followed this audit process in conducting audits beginningwith FY 1984. The experience gained clearly indicates that a more efficientand more expeditious approach to the audit of State IV-D programs is necessary.The average audit under the current approach has taken 21 months, fromthe end of the period to be audited to issuance of the final report. Onecontributory factor has been the numerous requirements which must be individuallyevaluated. Combined  with the statutory requirement for a triennial auditand the allowance for a corrective action period of up to one year, thecurrent approach is unwieldy at best and postpones engaging the attentionof State and local program administrators, and the accomplishment of remedialaction to correct deficiencies noted, until much too long after the closeof the time period subject to audit. We have found that in order to complywith the statutory requirement for a triennial audit, auditors must occasionallygo back into a State to conduct a new audit even before that State hascompleted corrective action indicated by the prior audit.OCSE has already taken administrative steps to ease this process but theydo not go far enough in alleviating the problems. After extensive evaluationand analysis of operational experience encompassing better than three years,OCSE has determined that the regulatory changes proposed herein are necessary.The proposed rule will consolidate the current audit criteria by majorprogram function. Thus, instead of auditing each criterion separately,two or more will be grouped under one performance standard for evaluation.This will allow the objective of the audit to be met in a less complex,more expeditious manner while maintaining the reliability and integrityof the audit. In addition, in the audit regulations published October 1,1985 (50 FR 40120), we stated that additional performance indicator componentsmeasuring paternity establishment and cost avoidance would be added tothe performance measurement portion of the audit. Those indicator componentsare included in this proposed regulation. To correspond with the additionalindicator components, we are proposing a revised scoring system. We arealso strengthening the standard by which we judge State performance onthe three current performance indicator components which measure AFDC andnon-AFDC cost effectiveness and AFDC cost recovery. The current standardfor those performance indicator components was based on State performanceduring fiscal year 1983. We believe the proposed standard takes into considerationthe significant improvements that have been made in the operation of Stateprograms since fiscal year 1983 as a result of changes made in responseto the ``Child Support Enforcement Amendments of 1984.'' This proposed rule is to be an interim step in perfecting the audit approach.We anticipate further revising the audit process at such time as standardsfor the provision of program services currently under development are implementedin final regulatory form. Therefore, these proposed rules present the mostpractical solution for immediate improvement of the audit process. <ITAG tagnum="84">Statutory Authority </ITAG>These proposed regulations are published under the authority of sections1102, 402(a)(27), 452(a)(4) and 403(h) of the Act. Section 1102 authorizesthe Secretary of HHS to publish regulations not inconsistent with the Actwhich may be necessary to efficiently administer the Secretary's functionsunder the Act. Section 402(a)(27) requires each State to operate a childsupport program in substantial compliance with the title IV-D State planand section 452(a)(4) requires the audit of each State IV-D program toassure compliance with title IV-D requirements at least once every threeyears (or not less often than annually in the case of any State which isbeing penalized, or is operating under a corrective action plan). Finally,section 403(h) provides for the imposition of an audit penalty of not lessthan one nor more than five percent of a State's AFDC funding for any Statewhich fails to substantially comply with title IV-D requirements, withan allowance for a corrective action period.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Provisions </ITAG>OCSE proposes to revise Part 305 of the current regulations governing theaudit of State child support programs to provide flexibility in the timingof the audits; to streamline the evaluation criteria through consolidationof related criteria and elimination of duplicative and extraneous subcriteria;and to make other changes to strengthen and improve the audit process.Audit Period The current regulations at andSection; 305.11 require audits of State childsupport programs to be conducted on a fiscal year basis. To provide greaterflexibility in scheduling the audits and follow-up reviews, we proposeto replace the current requirement that the audit cover the period of October1 through September 30, of each fiscal year audited with a requirementthat the audit cover a period comprised cf not more than 12 nor less thanthree consecutive months. In addition, we propose to revise the currentrequirement that the follow-up review conducted in States operating undercorrective action plans with respect to State plan criteria cover the firstfull quarter after the corrective action period with a requirement thatsuch audits cover the first three-month period beginning after the correctiveaction period. With respect to the performance indicator, the follow-upreview would cover the first full Federal fiscal year following the dateon which the penalty notice was issued. We propose to make a technical correction to the last sentence of thisparagraph by replacing the provision that the audit may cover a shorterperiod at State request with the proviso that the audit may, at State request,be conducted prior to the end of the one-year period prescribed under sectionandSection; 305.10(b). State Comments Current regulations at andSection; 305.12(a) include a provision for informingthe IV-D agency during the audit entrance conference of those politicalsubdivisions of the State that will be audited. We propose to replace thisprovision with more general language indicating that any necessary arrangementsfor conducting the audit will be made at the audit entrance conference.State Cooperation States are required to cooperate with OCSE in the conduct of Federal auditsby providing such records and documentation as requested, under currentregulations at andSection; 305.13(a). Paragraph (b) of the current regulationprovides that a State,s failure to comply with the requirement for cooperationmay necessitate a finding that the State has failed to comply with theparticular criterion being audited. The requirement for State cooperation has taken on increased importancebecause of program instructions (OCSE-AT-87-7), issued August 31, 1987,which made procedural changes relating to the preparation for State IV-Dprogram audits. Under OCSE-AT-87-7, OCSE instituted a centralized auditapproach whereby, effective for all program results audits and follow-upreviews initiated after October 1, 1987, States must provide a completeand accurate listing of all active and inactive IV-D cases. The IV-D caselisting is used as a universe from which to randomly select case filesfor review. OCSE-AT-87-7 also requires States to submit, to a central location(s),copies of complete case files and related documentation for all samplecases selected for review. State cooperation in the preparation for an audit, including compliancewith the requirements of OCSE-AT-87-7, is essential for OCSE auditors todetermine whether the State has an effective IV-D program which is in substantialcompliance with Federal requirements. Therefore, we propose to revise paragraph(b) to indicate that failure to comply with the requirement for State cooperationin the conduct of the audit <T3>will </T3>necessitate a finding that the State has failed to substantiallycomply with title IV-D requirements. Such a finding could result in impositionof the audit penalty. Reference to the revised andSection; 305.13(b) wouldbe added to the list of criteria at andSection; 305.20(a) which must be fullymet as a condition of substantial compliance. Effective Support Enforcement Program Current regulations at andSection; 305.20 provide the criteria which areevaluated to measure State compliance with the IV-D State plan requirementscontained in part 302. Regulations at andSection; 305.20(a) list selectedcriteria and related subcriteria that must be fully met or under whichthe procedures involved must be used in at least 75 percent of the casesreviewed for audits conducted in fiscal year 1984. Additional criteriaand related subcriteria incorporated into the audit of State child supportprograms for audit periods subsequent to FY 1984 because of changes intitle IV-D of the Act are listed in andSection; 305.20 (b), (c), and (d).In total, the regulations list 30 operational criteria which must be fullymet and 26 functional criteria where the required procedures must be usedin 75 percent of the cases reviewed. Each of the 30 ? operational criteriamust be reviewed separately and each of the 26 functional criteria mustbe reviewed and evaluated separately. Experience from audits conducted using the above substantial compliancecriteria revealed that the current audit process is cumbersome and inordinatelytime-consuming. Many of the criteria evaluated overlap, resulting in unnecessary,duplicative efforts and unavoidable delays in conducting the audits andissuing the findings. Operational and Functional Criteria To streamline and expedite the audit process, consistent with reliabilityand audit inteqrity, we are proposing to replace the current contents ofandSection; 305.20 (a) through (d) with new paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).<ITAG tagnum="81">I. Operational Criteria </ITAG>Paragraph (a) would list operational criteria which States must fully meetfor audits conducted for any period beginning after publication of thisregulation in final form. Operational criteria and related subcriteriaare, with the exception of Expedited Processes, requirements which areprocedural in nature. The ten operational criteria proposed are: (1) State Cooperation, under which the requirement for cooperating withthe Office in the conduct of an audit under andSection; 305.13 would be evaluated;(2) Statewide Operation, under which the requirement for uniform statewideoperation of the IV-D program under andSection; 305.21 (a) and (c), publicizingchild support enforcement services under andSection; 305.44 and enteringinto cooperative arrangements under andSection; 305.34 would be evaluated;(3) Single and Separate Organizational Unit, under which the requirementfor a single and separate unit to administer the State IV-D plan underandSection; 305.23 would be evaluated; (4) Reports and Maintenance of Records, under which the requirements formaintaining records, case files and required reports under andSection; 305.35(a), (b), and (c) would be evaluated; (5) Financial Accountability, under which the following requirements wouldbe evaluated as appropriate: collection and reporting of interest and allappropriate fees (including those provided under andSection; 303.69(e), andSection;303.72(i), andSection; 303.100 (d)(2)(iii) and (e)(3), andSection; 303.102(f),andSection; 303.105(c), andSection; 305.31(b), andSection; 305.33(b), andSection;305.48(b)(3), and andSection; 305.55); fiscal policies and accountabilityunder andSection; 305.36; bonding of employees under andSection; 305.37; separationof cash handling and accounting functions under andSection; 305.38; and paymentof incentives under andSection; 305.46; (6) Medical Support, under which the requirement for furnishing informationto the State Medicaid Agency under andSection; 305.56(b) would be evaluated;(7) Child Support Guidelines, under which the requirement for guidelinesunder andSection; 305.47 would be evaluated; (8) Expedited Processes, under which the requirement to have and use anexpedited process system for processing child support orders under andSection;305.50 would be evaluated; (9) Interstate Cooperation, under which the requirements for cooperationwith other States under andSection; 305.32 (a) and (f) through (h) wouldbe evaluated; and (10) Continuation of Services, under which the requirement for providingservices to former AFDC families under andSection; 305.31(c) would be evaluated.<ITAG tagnum="81">II. Functional Criteria </ITAG>The proposed paragraph andSection; 305.20(b) would provide functional criteria,under which, beginning with audits conducted for any period beginning afterpublication of this regulation as a final rule, as a condition for a findingof substantial compliance, States must use the required procedures forthe criterion in at least 75 percent of the cases reviewed which requiredsuch service. Functional criteria and related subcriteria are service-orientedrequirements which are evaluated through case review. Because separateefficiency rates are computed for each functional criterion, for any casereviewed, a State could receive credit for taking appropriate action undercertain criteria and fail other criteria in which it took no action. The five functional criteria proposed are: (1) Paternity, under which the following requirements would be evaluated,as appropriate: The requirement for having and using procedures for obtainingthe identity of the putative father and establishing paternity under andSection;305.24 (a) and (b), interstate paternity establishment under andSection;305.32(c) and providing location services under andSection; 305.33(c); (2) Support Obligations, under which the following requirements would beevaluated, as appropriate: establishment of a support order under andSection;305.25 (a) and (b), interstate cooperation in establishing a support orderunder andSection; 305.32(d), location services under andSection; 305.33(c),establishing a medical support order under andSection; 305.56(a) and prohibitionfrom retroactive modification of child support arrearages under andSection;305.57; (3) Enforcement, under which the following requirements would be evaluated:providing enforcement services under andSection; 305.26 (a), (b), and (c),interstate enforcement services under andSection; 305.32(e), location servicesunder andSection; 305.33(c), spousal support enforcement under andSection;305.42, medical support enforcement under andSection; 305.56(a) and makinginformation available to consumer reporting agencies under andSection; 305.54and, when appropriate, use of one or more of the specialized enforcementtechniques (withholding of unemployment compensation benefits under andSection;305.39 (b), (c), (d), and (e), Federal income tax refund offset under andSection;305.40, State income tax refund offset under andSection; 305.51, impositionof liens under andSection; 305.52, and posting security, bond or guaranteeof support under andSection; 305.53); (4) Collection/Distribution, under which the following requirements wouldbe evaluated, as appropriate: Support payments to the IV-D agency underandSection; 305.27 (a), (b), and (c), distribution of support payments underandSection; 305.28, payments to the family under andSection; 305.29, collectingand forwarding interstate collections under andSection; 305.32(e), recoveryof direct payments under andSection; 305.41, annual notice of collectionof assigned support under andSection; 305.45(a), and payment of support throughthe IV-D agency or other entity under andSection; 305.48 (a) and (b) (1)and (2); (5) Wage or income withholding, under which the requirements for carrying-outa program for withholding under andSection; 305.49 would be evaluated. Under this proposal, location, interstate cooperation and medical supportenforcement functions are included under each separate functional criterion,i.e., paternity establishment, support order establishment and enforcement.In addition, provision of services to non-AFDC families are reviewed undereach functional criterion.Although wage withholding is an enforcement technique, we have made ita separate functional criterion because, while States have discretion withrespect to the use of other enforcement techniques as long as there iscompliance with Federal regulations, State written procedures and Stateguidelines, wage withholding must be implemented in all cases which meetthe conditions for withholding. Therefore, if case circumstances meet therequirements for implementation of wage withholding and the State implementswage withholding for the case in accordance with Federal requirements,the State would meet the functional audit criterion for Wage Withholdingin that case. However, if the case circumstances also met the State's guidelinesfor use of State tax refund offset but the case was not submitted, theState would not meet the functional audit criterion for Enforcement inthat case. On the other hand, if the State's guidelines for posting security,bond or other guarantee of support indicate that it is inappropriate topost security, etc., if the case is under wage withholding, the State wouldnot fail the Enforcement criterion in that case if it failed to post security,bond or other guarantee of support, in accordance with those guidelines.Therefore, while wage withholding must be implemented in all cases whichmeet the conditions for withholding in order to meet the Wage Withholdingcriterion, States must use the enforcement techniques included under theEnforcement criterion only when appropriate as determined by Federal regulations,State written procedures and State guidelines. The rationale for deleting, retaining or consolidating the current criteriaand related subcriteria is discussed in detail under each specific Stateplan requirement at andSection; 305.21 through andSection; 305.56. The new paragraph (c) would require the criteria referred to in proposedandSection; 305.98 (e) and (f) relating to the performance indicator in proposedparagraph (d) of that section to be fully met beginning with the fiscalyear beginning after publication of the final rule. State Plan Requirements <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Statewide Operation </ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.21 (a) through (d) provide four subcriteriaevaluated to determine compliance with the State plan requirement for StatewideOperation under andSection; 302.10. We propose to delete paragraph (b) of the current regulations which requiresthat the State establish and utilize methods of informing staff of Statepolicies, standards, procedures and instructions. This requirement is integralto the current requirement at paragraph (a) which provides for the uniformadministration of the plan throughout the State and paragraph (d) whichrequires that the service and functions required by the plan are made availablethroughout the State. In addition, under current regulations only the provision of paragraph(d) is a substantial compliance subcriterion. Under the proposed rule,paragraph (a) would also be a substantial compliance subcriterion undera separate criterion evaluating Statewide Operation under andSection; 305.20(a).This is an important evaluation criterion which should be strengthenedbecause compliance problems with this State plan requirement can lead towidespread service deficiencies. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. State Financial Participation </ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.22 provide subcriteria evaluated todetermine compliance with the State plan requirement for State financialparticipation under andSection; 302.11. We propose to make a technical changeto paragraph (a) by deleting the specific percentage of program administrativecosts representing the State share. We believe that inclusion of thesepercentages is superfluous as paragraph (a) requires the State to incurthe applicable share of program costs. In addition, we propose to consolidatethe current requirement at paragraph (b) regarding the nature of the fundingof the State share of costs with the requirement at paragraph (a). Under current regulations, subcriteria included under paragraph (a) and(b) of andSection; 305.22 must be fully met under a separate operationalcriterion at andSection; 305.20 for a substantial compliance finding. Underthe proposed regulation andSection; 305.22 would no longer be included asa substantial compliance criterion because State financial participationis routinely evaluated under the financial management function and problemsof compliance are rarely identified. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Single and Separate Organizational Unit</ITAG>Existing regulations at andSection; 305.23 provide three subcriteria evaluatedto determine compliance with the State plan requirement for a single andseparate organizational unit to administer the plan found at andSection;302.12. The first of these subcriteria, found at paragraph (a), requires that aState must have a unit which is responsible and accountable for the operationof the IV-D plan and no other program or activity. We propose to revisethis provision by deleting the prohibition from operating other programsor activities. This change is being sought to allow the IV-D agency totrack and monitor support payments for non-IV-D cases as authorized underandSection; 302.57, and to take into consideration activities which are relatedto the enforcement of child support but which do not fall under the realmof the State plan. Such activities are allowable provided the State hasa system for adequately allocating the costs of activities performed outsidethe State plan. In addition, we are proposing to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having staff perform the specified functions, as the requirementsunder paragraphs (a) and (b) for a single and separate organizational unitto administer the IV-D plan inherently include having personnel performthe necessary activities. The criterion for a single and separate organizational unit is being retainedunder the operational criteria which must be fully met in order to achievea finding of substantial compliance at andSection; 305.20(a). <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Establishing Paternity </ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.24 include seven subcriteria evaluatedto measure State compliance with the State plan requirement for establishingpaternity under andSection; 302.31(a) and andSection; 302.33. Under the proposed regulation only the subcriteria currently included underandSection; 305.24 (a) and (b) would be retained. The current paragraph (c) requires States to utilize procedures to establishthe paternity of any child born out of wedlock whose paternity has notbeen previously established. We propose to delete this requirement becauseit is already covered under paragraph (b), which requires States to haveand utilize written procedures to establish the paternity of any childat least until the child's 18th birthday. Under the current paragraph (d), States must identify and list laboratorieswhich perform acceptable tests and provide such lists to courts, law enforcementofficials and the public. Current paragraph (e) requires the identificationof State statutes for establishing paternity. Paragraph (f) requires attorneysto be available to work paternity cases and paragraph (g) requires theavailability of additional personnel. We are proposing to delete theserequirements for purposes of the audit because compliance problems withthese subcriteria would be revealed in the evaluation of the State's actualperformance in establishing paternity. To correspond with these changes, we are also proposing to delete the correspondingoperational subcriteria which must be fully met for a substantial compliancefinding at andSection; 305.20 under the current audit. Paragraphs (a) and(b) of the proposed regulation would remain functional subcriteria underthe separate criterion evaluating Paternity at the proposed andSection; 305.20(b).<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Support Obligations </ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.25 provide subcriteria evaluated todetermine State compliance with the State plan requirement to establishsupport obligations found under andSection; 302.50 and andSection; 302.53.Regulations at andSection; 305.25(a) require States to establish and utilizeprocedures for establishing a child support obligation for any child: (1)With respect to whom there is an assignment under AFDC or Foster Care,or with respect to whom there is an application for services, and (2) whohas not previously had a legally enforceable support obligation established.We propose to delete subparagraph (a)(1) to provide consistency with otherrequirements in Part 305 and because, unless otherwise stated, the requirementsin Part 305 apply to the review of all IV-D cases. We also propose to deletesubparagraph (a)(2) because States should modify existing orders underappropriate circumstances and the present rule could be construed as implyingthat such action was not required once an order was established. In addition, we are proposing to delete andSection; 305.25 (c) and (d) asboth paragraphs prescribe staffing requirements which are not necessarybecause the requirement to establish support obligations inherently includeshaving the staff available to perform the necessary functions. Regulations at andSection; 305.25 (a) and (b) will remain functional subcriteriaunder the criterion evaluating Support Obligation at andSection; 305.20(b),wherein a State must take appropriate action to establish a support obligationin at least 75 percent of the cases reviewed. Additional subcriteria toevaluate the location function with respect to cases requiring supportorder establishment, establishment of medical support orders, establishmentof support orders with respect to interstate cases and prohibition fromretroactive modification of child support arrearages will be added to thecriterion evaluating Support Obligations at andSection; 305.20(b). Undercurrent regulations, these requirements are evaluated separately.<ITAG tagnum="81"> 6. Enforcement of Support Obligation</ITAG> Current regulations at andSection; 305.26 provide the subcriteria evaluatedto determine compliance with the State plan requirement for enforcing supportobligations under andSection; 302.31(b). Under the current regulations at andSection; 305.26(c), States are requiredto have identified and established written procedures to enforce supportobligations. We propose to revise andSection; 305.26(c) to require Statesto have established and be utilizing written procedures to enforce supportobligations because the requirement to establish written procedures assumesthat they must first be identified. In addition, adding the requirementfor utilization of procedures would provide consistency with the wordingof other criteria under Part 305. We would also delete andSection; 305.26(e),which requires that appropriate action be taken using the State's procedures. We are also proposing to delete paragraphs (f) and (g) under andSection;305.26. Both represent staffing requirements which are already impliedunder the functional requirements to enforce support obligations at (a),(b), and (c). To correspond with these changes, we are proposing to delete the currentoperational subcriteria at andSection; 305.26 (c) and (d) which must be fullymet under andSection; 305.20 for a substantial compliance finding with respectto the State plan requirement for enforcing support obligations. The proposedparagraph (c) would become a functional subcriterion along with paragraphs(a) and (b) under the operational criterion evaluating Enforcement. Additionalsubcriteria under the proposed Enforcement criterion at andSection; 305.20(b)would be added to address the use of certain enforcement techniques andenforcement services pertaining to interstate, medical support and spousalsupport orders. Under the current regulations each of these services isa separate evaluation criterion.<ITAG tagnum="81">7. Support Payments to the IV-D Agency</ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.27 provide subcriteria evaluated todetermine compliance with the State plan requirement of support paymentsto the IV-D agency under andSection; 302.32. Current regulations at andSection; 305.27 (a) and (b) require States tohave established and utilize procedures for the receipt of support paymentsby the IV-D agency with respect to cases where there is an AFDC or FosterCare assignment of support rights and with respect to cases where a non-AFDCapplication has been made, respectively. We propose to delete from paragraph(a) all that follows the word agency, which provides that the requirementapplies to AFDC and Foster Care cases, and to delete paragraph (b) in itsentirety, which provides that the requirement applies to non-AFDC casesexcept as provided under subparagraphs (1) and (2). We are proposing thischange for consistency with other requirements in Part 305 and because,unless otherwise stated, the requirements in Part 305 apply to the reviewof all IV-D cases. In addition, the exceptions to the requirement for receiptof non-AFDC child support payments under (b) (1) and (2), which allow directpayments to the family if the State does not recover costs and if the Statehas an approved system for reporting the collections, respectively, areoutdated. State IV-D agencies must have and utilize procedures for thereceipt of child support collections made on behalf of <T3>all</T3> IV-D cases (emphasis added). Paragraphs (c) and (d) wouldbe redesignated as paragraphs (b) and (c), respectively.In addition, paragraph (e), which requires staff to perform these functions,would be deleted because the requirement to utilize procedures inherentlyincludes having staff perform the necessary functions. Under the revised regulation, paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) would be includedas functional subcriteria under the criterion evaluating Collection/Distributionat andSection; 305.20(b). Paragraphs (a), (b), and (d) are currently evaluatedunder a separate criterion of support payments to the IV-D agency. <ITAG tagnum="81">8. Distribution of Support Payments </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.28 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for distributing child supportcollections under andSection;andSection; 302.51, 302.52 and andSection; 302.32.Current requirements at andSection; 305.28(a) require States to have writtenprocedures which if properly applied would result in proper distribution.Paragraph (b) of these regulations requires that States make distributionin accordance with the procedures established. We propose to revise paragraph(a) to require States to have and utilize procedures for the distributionof collections in accordance with regulations. This would be consistentwith other audit evaluation criteria included under Part 305 and wouldconsolidate two separate subcriteria. Accordingly, paragraph (b) wouldbe deleted. We are also proposing to delete the requirement at paragraph (c) whichrequires the State to have personnel distributing support collections.The requirement to utilize procedures for distributing collections inherentlyincludes a requirement that staff perform the necessary functions. We propose to delete the operational criterion of andSection; 305.28 whichmust be fully met under the current andSection; 305.20 as a condition ofa substantial compliance finding. Because casework will reveal complianceproblems, the procedural requirement is not necessary. Section 305.28 willbecome a functional subcriterion under the criterion evaluating Collection/Distributionat andSection; 305.20(b) as proposed, wherein support payments must be properlycollected and distributed in at least 75 percent of the cases reviewed.Under the current regulation this is a single evaluation criterion whichis evaluated separately. <ITAG tagnum="81">9. Payments to the Family </ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.29 provide subcriteria evaluated todetermine compliance with the State plan requirements for distributingpayments to the family under andSection;andSection; 302.32 and 302.51. Currentrequirements at andSection; 305.29 would remain unchanged. However, for purposesof evaluating substantial compliance under andSection; 305.20, the criterionwould be consolidated as a functional subcriterion under the criterionevaluating Collection/Distribution wherein support must be properly collectedand distributed in at least 75 percent of the cases reviewed. Under currentregulations this criterion is evaluated separately. <ITAG tagnum="81">10. Individuals Not Otherwise Eligible </ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.31 provide subcriteria evaluated todetermine compliance with the State plan requirement for providing servicesto individuals not otherwise eligible (non-AFDC applicants) under andSection;302.33. Under the current paragraph (b), States must have established and be utilizingwritten procedures for providing all appropriate services under the Stateplan to non-AFDC applicants including locating absent parents, establishingpaternity and securing support. We propose to delete this evaluation subcriterionas the provision of appropriate services for non-AFDC families is includedunder each specific service and need not be re-evaluated under a separatecriterion. Paragraph (c) would accordingly be redesignated as paragraph(b). We are proposing to add a new paragraph (c) to require that States haveand utilize written procedures for providing appropriate title IV-D servicesto former AFDC families in accordance with andSection; 302.51(e). This changewould also be reflected in the introductory sentence by adding referenceto andSection; 302.51(e) following the reference to andSection; 302.33. Weare proposing this change because the requirement for continuing to provideservices to former AFDC families is more appropriately evaluated underthe requirement for non-AFDC services than under the requirement for distributionwhere it is currently evaluated. In addition, we are proposing to delete the current requirement at paragraph(d), which requires that personnel perform support enforcement servicesfor non-AFDC families. The requirement for States to provide such servicesinherently includes having personnel perform the required functions. Under the current regulations at andSection; 305.20, paragraphs (a), (b),and (c) of andSection; 305.31 are functional subcriteria under a separatecriterion for providing services to individuals not otherwise eligible.We propose to delete the separate review of services to individuals nototherwise eligible because each subcriterion is currently reviewed underthe appropriate criterion: Paternity; Support Obligation; Enforcement:Collection/Distribution; Wage or Income Withholding; and Expedited Processes.The requirement for the collection of fees and recovery of costs underthe newly designated paragraph (b) would be reviewed under the proposedcriterion at andSection; 305.20(a) evaluating Financial Accountability. Paragraph(c), as proposed, would become a separate operational criterion evaluatingContinuation of Services under the proposed andSection; 305.20(a).<ITAG tagnum="81">11. Provision of Services in Interstate IV-D Cases </ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.32 provide subcriteria evaluated todetermine compliance with the State plan requirement for interstate cooperationunder andSection; 302.36. We propose to amend these regulations by deleting paragraphs (i) and (j).Both requirements pertain to staffing requirements which are inherent inutilizing the required procedures. Under the current regulations at andSection; 305.20, paragraphs (a) through(h) of andSection; 305.32 are functional subcriteria under a separate criterionfor providing services in interstate cases, wherein the required proceduresmust be utilized in at least 75 percent of the cases reviewed for a substantialcompliance finding. We propose to delete the current separate functionalcriterion for providing interstate services and consolidate the currentsubcriteria at andSection; 305.32 (c), (d), and (e) with the applicable service-relatedcriterion under andSection; 305.20(b): Paternity, Support Obligation, Enforcementand Collection/Distribution. In addition, we propose to add a new operationalcriterion under andSection; 305.20(a) which would require that a State fullymeet the requirements of paragraphs andSection; 305.32 (a) and (f) through(h) in order to be found in substantial compliance. The requirement at andSection; 305.32(b) for locating absent parents in interstatecases has not been included as a subcriterion as the locate requirementsunder andSection; 305.33 apply to interstate and intrastate cases and would,under the proposed regulation, be added to each of the service-relatedcriteria. <ITAG tagnum="81">12. State Parent Locator Services (PLS) </ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.33 provide subcriteria measured todetermine compliance with the State plan requirement for a parent locatorservice under andSection; 302.35. Current regulations at andSection; 305.33(a) require States to have and utilizea central PLS office as required by andSection; 302.35(a). Regulations atparagraph (e) further provide that States have procedures for acceptingapplications to use the PLS from authorized persons. We propose to deleteparagraph (e) and to consolidate those requirements under paragraph (a)to provide that States must have and be utilizing a State PLS as requiredby andSection; 302.35 (a) and (c). Paragraph (b) of the current regulations requires a State to identify andutilize major local data sources. Current paragraph (c) requires the Stateto identify and utilize major State data sources. Current paragraph (d)requires the use of the Federal PLS when necessary. We propose to deleteall three paragraphs because the requirements are included under currentparagraph (g) which requires the State to use the names and identifyinginformation of absent parents, the State and local locate data sourcesand the Federal PLS in an attempt to determine the whereabouts of the absentparent. Current paragraphs (f) and (g) would be redesignated as paragraphs(b) and (c), respectively. We propose to insert in proposed paragraph (c),after State and local locate data sources, the phrase, ``such as thoselisted in andSection; 303.3 of this chapter.'' In addition, we propose to delete current paragraph (h) which providesstaffing requirements because the requirement to use procedures and takeaction inherently includes a requirement to have personnel performing therequired functions. Under current regulations the requirements at paragraph (e) must be fullymet under andSection; 305.20 to substantiate a finding of substantial compliance.The current requirements at paragraph (a) and (c) are reviewed under aseparate functional requirement wherein the required procedures must beutilized in 75 percent of the cases reviewed. We propose to delete boththe operational and functional criteria for the State PLS from andSection;305.20 because the location function, except with respect to a minimalnumber of cases, is the initial step to providing all other major programservices, i.e., paternity establishment, support order establishment andenforcement. Therefore, cases requiring absent parent location will beevaluated under the major service required for the case. Thus if a caserequired paternity services and the absent parent's whereabouts were unknown,the State must take all appropriate action to locate the absent parent.If the State did not take appropriate action to locate the absent parentand establish paternity, this would be counted against the State in computingthe efficiency rate for paternity establishment. The requirement underthe proposed paragraph (b) for collecting necessary fees would be reviewedunder the proposed criterion at andSection; 305.20(a) for evaluating FinancialAccountability. <ITAG tagnum="81">13. Cooperative Arrangements </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.34 require as a measure of compliance withthe State plan requirement for cooperative arrangements under andSection;302.34, that a State must enter into written cooperative agreements withappropriate courts and officials when necessary to provide required services.This proposed rule would not change this evaluation criterion for managementpurposes but would delete it at a separate operational criterion whichmust be fully met under andSection; 305.20. We propose to consolidate thisrequirement as a subcriterion under the operational criterion evaluatingStatewide Operation under the proposed andSection; 305.20(a).<ITAG tagnum="81">14. Reports and Maintenance of Records </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.35 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for reports and maintenanceof records under andSection; 302.15. We propose to add a new paragraph (b) to require States to utilize proceduresfor establishing and maintaining case file records containing all informationpertaining to the case, in accordance with andSection; 303.2. We are proposingthis change because the establishment of a case file at intake and theproper documentation and maintenance of case file records is essentialto providing appropriate services. In addition, unless a case is properlydocumented, auditors will not be able to identify what services are neededor what action has been taken. It is, therefore, in the State's best interestto ensure that all relevant information is included in the case file. We propose to delete andSection; 305.35(c), the requirement that the Statehave personnel performing the necessary functions, as the requirement toutilize procedures and maintain case files inherently includes that personnelperform the necessary functions. In addition, the new paragraph (b) would be added, along with the requirementsof paragraphs (a) and (c), as operational subcriteria under the operationalcriterion evaluating Reports and Maintenance of Records at andSection; 305.20(a)which must be fully met as a condition of a substantial compliance finding.<ITAG tagnum="81">15. Fiscal Policies and Accountability </ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 305.36 provide subcriteria evaluated todetermine compliance with the State plan requirement for fiscal policiesand accountability under andSection; 302.14. We propose to delete andSection; 305.36(b), the requirement that the Statehave personnel performing the functions specified in this section, as therequirement in paragraph (a), that the State establish and utilize an accountingsystem, assumes that the State will have personnel performing the requiredfunctions. In addition, we propose to delete the operational criterion for fiscalpolicies under andSection; 305.20 and to consolidate the requirement as asubcriterion under the new criterion evaluating Financial Accountabilityat andSection; 305.20(a), as proposed. <ITAG tagnum="81">16. Bonding of Employees </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.37 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for bonding of employees underandSection; 302.19. Paragraph (a) requires written procedures for ensuringthat all appropriate personnel are covered by a bond and paragraph (b)requires that the State have written procedures for obtaining a bond inan adequate amount. Paragraph (c) requires the State to use the proceduresreferred to in paragraphs (a) and (b). We propose to delete the requirements under paragraphs (a) and (b) forwritten procedures and to consolidate the requirements of paragraphs (a),(b), and (c) into one paragraph under andSection; 305.37. The revised andSection;305.37 would require States to ensure that every person who has accessto or control over funds collected under the program is covered by a bondin an amount the State deems adequate to indemnify the State IV-D programfor loss resulting from employee dishonesty. We are proposing this changebecause the emphasis should be on whether employees were covered by a bondnot on the State's procedures to do so. In addition, we are proposing to delete the separate criterion for bondingof employees at andSection; 305.20 and add the requirement as an operationalsubcriterion under the proposed criterion evaluating Financial Accountabilityat andSection; 305.20(a). 17. Separation of Cash Handling and Accounting Functions Regulations at andSection; 305.38 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for the separation of cash handlingand accounting functions under andSection; 302.20. Under paragraph (a), States are required to have written procedures, designedto assure (1) the separation of cash handling and accounting functionsand (2) use of generally accepted accounting procedures. Paragraph (b)provides that the requirement under paragraph (a) does not apply to Stateswhich have been granted waivers under andSection; 302.20(c) and paragraph(c) requires States to use the written procedures specified in paragraph(a). We propose to revise andSection; 305.38 to delete the requirement for writtenprocedures under paragraph (a)(1), to delete paragraph (a)(2) in its entiretyand to consolidate the remaining requirements under one paragraph. As revised,andSection; 305.38 would require States to ensure that persons responsiblefor handling cash receipts of support do not participate in accountingor operating functions which would permit them to conceal the misuse ofsupport payments except with respect to sparsely populated geographic areasgranted a waiver under andSection; 302.20(c) of this chapter. We are proposingthis change because the emphasis should be placed on the actual separationof cash handling and accounting functions and not on the State's writtenprocedures to do so. In addition, we are proposing to delete the separate criterion for separationof cash handling and accounting functions at andSection; 305.20 and add therequirement at andSection; 305.38 as an operational subcriterion under thecriterion evaluating Financial Accountability.<ITAG tagnum="81"> 18. Withholding of Unemployment Compensation</ITAG> Regulations at andSection; 305.39 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for the withholding of unemploymentcompensation under andSection; 302.65. We propose to amend andSection; 305.39 (b) through (h) by adding at eachparagraph the requirement to use the procedures required. Under the currentregulation, paragraph (i) requires the use of all procedures specifiedunder andSection; 305.39. However, because we propose to review only paragraphs(b), (c), (d) and (e) for purposes of determining substantial complianceunder andSection; 305.20, separate requirements for utilizing proceduresare necessary in each paragraph. To correspond with this change paragraph(i) would be deleted. In addition, we are proposing to delete andSection; 305.39(j) which requiresthat staff perform the activities described throughout andSection; 305.39because the use of staff is inherent in the requirement to use procedures. Under current regulations, requirements at andSection; 305.39 (a) through(h) are operational subcriteria which must be fully met under andSection;305.20 as a condition of substantial compliance. We are proposing to deletethe operational criteria because review of the State's actual use of withholdingprocedures under the functional criteria is a better measure of State compliancethan a review of their written procedures. Current regulations at andSection;305.20 provide a separate functional criterion for evaluation of the requirementsin andSection; 305.39 (a) through (h). We are proposing to delete the separatecriterion and to include the subcriteria at andSection; 305.39 (b), (c),(d) and (e) under the proposed criterion evaluating Enforcement at andSection;305.20(b). We are only including these subcriteria because the remainingrequirements are either not conducive to evaluation based on case filereview or are of a technical nature.<ITAG tagnum="81"> 19. Federal Tax Refund Offset</ITAG> Regulations at andSection; 305.40 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for Federal tax refund offsetunder andSection; 302.60. We propose to revise andSection; 305.40 to consolidate the requirementsof paragraphs (a) and (b) to provide that States must have and utilizeprocedures for the withholding of past-due support from Federal tax refunds.Under current regulations paragraph (b) requires use of the proceduresrequired under paragraph (a). Because procedures are not in and of themselvesa substantive measure of State performance, we believe that the criteriashould be consolidated. Paragraph (c) requires States to have personnel performing the functionsrequired under andSection; 305.40. We are proposing to delete this subcriterionas the requirement to utilize procedures inherently entails having personnelperform the necessary functions. Under current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement to havewritten procedures providing for Federal tax refund offset is a separateoperational criterion which must be fully met as a condition of substantialcompliance. We are proposing to delete the operational criterion becausethe functional criterion to use the required procedures is a better measureof State performance and will disclose procedural deficiencies. The functionalcriterion which is currently evaluated separately would become a subcriterionunder the proposed criterion evaluating Enforcement at andSection; 305.20(b).<ITAG tagnum="81"> 20. Recovery of Direct Payments</ITAG> Regulations at andSection; 305.41 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for recovery of direct paymentsunder andSection; 302.31(a). We propose to revise andSection; 305.41 by consolidating the requirementto have written procedures for the recovery of direct payments at paragraph(a) with the requirement at paragraph (b) to use such procedures. Becauseprocedures are not in and of themselves a substantive measure of Stateperformance, we believe the requirement need not be stated and reviewedindependently. In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having personnel perform the specified functions as the requirementto use procedures inherently includes having personnel perform the necessaryactivities. Under the current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement tohave written procedures for the recovery of direct payments is a separateoperational criterion which must be fully met as a condition of substantialcompliance. The requirement to use procedures is a separate functionalcriterion wherein the required procedures must be used in 75 percent ofthe cases reviewed. We propose to delete the operational criterion as caseworkreviewed under the functional subcriterion would disclose any proceduraldeficiencies. The requirement for using procedures would become a functionalsubcriterion under the criterion evaluating Collection/Distribution atandSection; 305.20(b).<ITAG tagnum="81">21. Spousal Support </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.42 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for the collection of spousalsupport contained under andSection; 302.31(a). We propose to revise andSection; 305.42 by consolidating the requirementto have written procedures for the collections of spousal support underparagraph (a) with the requirement at paragraph (b) to use such procedures.As the main emphasis in determining compliance is the actual provisionof spousal support services, we believe the procedural requirement neednot be stated or reviewed independently. In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having personnel perform the specified functions as the requirementto use procedures inherently includes having personnel perform the necessaryactivities. Under andSection; 305.20, the requirement to have written procedures forenforcing spousal support is a separate operational criterion which mustbe fully met as a condition of a substantial compliance finding. The requirementto use such procedures is a separate functional criterion wherein the requiredprocedures must be utilized in 75 percent of the cases reviewed. We proposeto delete the operational criterion as casework reviewed under the functionalstandard will disclose procedural deficiencies and is indicative of Statecompliance. The requirement to use procedures for enforcing spousal supportorders would become a functional subcriterion under the new criterion evaluatingEnforcement. <ITAG tagnum="81">22. 90 Percent Federal Financial Participation (FFP) for ComputerizedEnforcement Systems </ITAG>Under current regulations at andSection; 305.43, a computerized system eligiblefor enhanced Federal funding must meet the requirements in andSection; 307.10.This is currently a separate operational criterion at andSection; 305.20which must be fully met as a condition of a finding of substantial compliance.We propose to delete andSection; 305.43 from the list of operational criterionwhich must be fully met under andSection; 305.20 because the certificationprocedures entailed in receiving such funding ensure compliance with theprocedural requirements of andSection; 307.10. <ITAG tagnum="81">23. Publicizing the Availability of Services </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.44 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for publicizing the availabilityof child support enforcement services under andSection; 302.30. Currentlythis requirement is included as a separate operational criterion underandSection; 305.20 which must be fully met as a condition of substantialcompliance. We propose to delete the separate criterion for reviewing compliancewith this requirement and to include it instead as a subcriterion underthe criterion evaluating Statewide Operation as proposed under andSection;305.20(a). While we believe that this is an important requirement, we donot believe the substance of andSection; 305.44 is a significant indicatorof compliance and compliance with this statutory requirement can be adequatelyassessed under the criterion evaluating Statewide Operation. We propose to make a technical correction to andSection; 305.44, by replacingthe period at the end of the introductory phrase with a colon. 24. Notice of Collection of Assigned Support Regulations at andSection; 305.45 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for providing notice of collectionof assigned support under andSection; 302.54. We propose to revise andSection; 305.45 by consolidating the requirementto have procedures for providing notice under paragraph (a) with the requirementat paragraph (b) to use such procedures. Because procedures are not inand of themselves a substantive measure of State performance, we believethe requirement need not be stated or reviewed independently. Section 305.45(a)(1) requires States to send an annual notice of the amountsof support collected during the past year to individuals who have assignedtheir rights to support under andSection; 232.11. We propose to clarify thisrequirement by prefacing it with the clause, ``with respect to those caseswhere there is a support order or, in the absence of an order, voluntarysupport payments have been made.'' This change is proposed to clarify that,while such notices must be sent even if no support was collected pursuantto a support order, a notice need not be sent if a support order has notbeen established and voluntary payments have not been made. We also propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph (c) forhaving personnel perform the specified functions, as the requirement touse procedures inherently includes having personnel perform the necessaryactivities. Under the current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement to havewritten procedures for providing notice is a separate operational criterionwhich must be fully met as a condition of substantial compliance. We proposeto delete the operational criterion as casework reviewed under the functionalcriterion is a better measure of State compliance and would disclose proceduraldeficiencies. The requirement for sending the notice under andSection; 305.45(a)would become a functional subcriterion under the criterion evaluating Collection/Distributionas proposed under andSection; 305.20(b). It is currently reviewed as a separatefunctional criterion.<ITAG tagnum="81">25. Incentive Payments to States and Political Subdivisions </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 302.46 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for incentive payments to Statesand political subdivisions under andSection; 305.55. We propose to revise andSection; 305.46 by consolidating the requirementto have written procedures for passing State incentives down to politicalsubdivisions at paragraph (a) with the requirement at paragraph (b) touse such procedures. As procedures are not in and of themselves a substantivemeasure of compliance, we believe the requirement need not be stated andreviewed independently. We also propose to delete the contents of andSection; 305.46(a)(2) whichrequire the State to have procedures to consider the efficiency and effectivenessof political subdivisions in determining the amount of the incentive payable.We are proposing this change as the requirement is already embraced byparagraph (a)(1) which requires that incentive payments to political subdivisionsbe made as determined by the State in accordance with andSection; 303.52(d).Regulations at andSection; 303.52(d) provide that the determination of theamount of incentives payable to political subdivisions should be basedon such subdivision's efficiency and effectiveness. In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having personnel perform the specified functions because the requirementto use procedures inherently includes having staff perform the necessaryactivities. Under current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement to havewritten procedures for passing incentives payments through to politicalsubdivisions is a separate operational criterion which must be fully metas a condition of substantial compliance. In addition, the requirementto use such procedures is a separate functional subcriterion under andSection;305.20. We propose to delete the functional criterion because the currentincentive structure is not conducive to review under the 75 percent standard.Instead we propose to review the requirement at andSection; 305.46 to utilizeprocedures for the pass-through of incentive payments as a subcriterionunder the proposed operational criterion evaluating Financial Accountability.<ITAG tagnum="81">26. Payment of Support Through the IV-D Agency or Other Entity </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.48 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the optional State plan requirement for payment of supportthrough the IV-D agency or other entity under andSection; 302.57. We propose to revise andSection; 305.48 by deleting the requirement to useprocedures at paragraph (c) and adding to paragraphs (a) and (b) the requirementto use the required written procedures providing for payment of supportthrough the IV-D agency or other entity. We are proposing this change asprocedures are not in and of themselves a substantive measure of Stateperformance and need not be reviewed individually. In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(d) for having personnel perform the specified functions as the requirementto utilize procedures inherently includes having personnel perform thenecessary activities. Under the current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirements atparagraph (a) and (b) are operational subcriteria which must be fully metas a condition of substantial compliance. The requirement to use such proceduresis a separate functional criterion wherein the required procedures mustbe used in 75 percent of the cases reviewed. We propose to delete the operationalcriterion as casework reviewed under the functional subcriterion will discloseany procedural deficiencies. The separate functional criterion for utilizingprocedures would, with the exception of paragraph (b)(3), become subcriteriaunder the proposed criterion evaluating Collection/Distribution at andSection;305.20(b). The requirement for collecting fees under the proposed paragraph(b)(3) would be reviewed under the proposed criterion evaluating FinancialAccountability at andSection; 305.20(a). <ITAG tagnum="81">27. Wage or Income Withholding </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.49 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for wage or income withholdingunder andSection; 302.70(a)(1). We propose to revise andSection; 305.49 by consolidating the requirementto have written procedures for carrying-out a program of withholding atparagraph (a) with the requirement at paragraph (b) to utilize such procedures.We are proposing this change because procedures are not in and of themselvesa substantive measure of State performance and need not be reviewed separately.In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having personnel perform the specified function as the requirementfor using procedures inherently includes having staff perform the necessaryfunctions. Under the current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement tohave written procedures providing for wage or income withholding at andSection;305.49(a) is a separate operational criterion which must be fully met asa condition of substantial compliance and the requirement under paragraph(b) to utilize such procedures is a separate functional criterion whereinthe required procedures must be utilized in 75 percent of the cases reviewed.We propose to delete the operational criterion as casework reviewed underthe functional criterion will disclose any procedural deficiencies. Theseparate functional criterion for utilizing procedures for wage or incomewithholding would be retained under andSection; 305.20(b).<ITAG tagnum="81"> 28. Expedited Processes</ITAG> Regulations at andSection; 305.50 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for expedited process underandSection; 302.70(a)(2). We propose to revise andSection; 305.50 by consolidating the requirementto have written procedures providing for an expedited process with therequirement at paragraph (b) to use such procedures. We are proposing thischange because such procedures are not in and of themselves a substantivemeasure of State performance and need not be stated and reviewed separately. In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having personnel perform the specified functions as the requirementto utilize procedures inherently includes having personnel perform thenecessary activities. The requirement for having an expedited process system will remain a separateoperational criterion under andSection; 305.20 which must be fully met asa condition of substantial compliance.<ITAG tagnum="81"> 29. State Income Tax Refund Offset</ITAG> Regulations at andSection; 305.51 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for collection of overdue supportby State income tax refund offset under andSection; 302.70(a)(3). We propose to revise andSection; 305.51 by consolidating the requirementat paragraph (a) to have written procedures for State tax offset with therequirement under paragraph (b) to utilize such procedures. We are proposingthis change because procedures are not in and of themselves a substantivemeasure of State performance and need not be stated or reviewed separately.In addition, we propose to delete from paragraph (a) all that follows theword ``refunds,'' which provides that the requirement applies to AFDC,Non-AFDC and Foster Care cases. We are proposing this change for consistencywith other requirements in Part 305 and because, unless otherwise stated,the requirements in Part 305 apply to the review of all IV-D cases. We propose to delete paragraph (c) of andSection; 305.51 which requiresthat personnel perform the specified functions because the requirementto utilize procedures inherently entails having personnel perform the necessaryfunctions. Under current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement to havewritten procedures providing for the offset of State tax refunds for collectionof overdue support is a separate operational criterion which must be fullymet to substantiate a finding of substantial compliance. The requirementto utilize those procedures is a separate functional criterion which mustbe met in 75 percent of the cases reviewed. We propose to delete the operationalcriterion as casework reviewed under the functional criterion will uncoverany procedural deficiencies. The functional criterion, which is currentlyevaluated separately, would become a subcriterion under the proposed criterionevaluating Enforcement at andSection; 305.20(b).<ITAG tagnum="81"> 30. Imposition of Liens</ITAG> Regulations at andSection; 305.52 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for the imposition of liensagainst real and personal property under andSection; 302.70(a)(4). We propose to revise andSection; 305.52 by consolidating the requirementat paragraph (a) to have procedures for the imposition of liens againstreal and personal property with the requirement at paragraph (b) to utilizesuch procedures. We are proposing this change because the major emphasisin determining State performance is the actual provision of services notthe availability of written procedures. In addition, we propose to delete paragraph (c) which requires the Stateto have personnel performing the specified functions. The requirement forutilizing procedures inherently includes having personnel perform the requiredfunctions. Under current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement to havewritten procedures for the imposition of liens against property is a separateoperational criterion which must be fully met to substantiate a findingof substantial compliance. The requirement to utilize those proceduresis a separate functional criterion wherein the required procedures mustbe utilized in 75 percent of the cases reviewed. We propose to delete theoperational criterion as casework reviewed under the functional criterionis a better measure of State compliance and will uncover any proceduraldeficiencies. The functional criterion which is currently evaluated separatelywould become a subcriterion under the proposed criterion evaluating Enforcement.<ITAG tagnum="81">31. Posting Security, Bond or Guarantee </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.53 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for posting security, bond orguarantee to secure payment of overdue support under andSection; 302.70(a)(6).We propose to revise andSection; 305.53 by consolidating the requirementat paragraph (a) to have written procedures requiring an absent parentto give security, post a bond or give other guarantee to secure supportwith the requirement at paragraph (b) to use such procedures. We are proposingthis change because such procedures are not in and of themselves a substantivemeasure of State performance and need not be stated and reviewed separately.In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having personnel perform the specified functions because the requirementto utilize procedures for posting bonds or giving guarantee of supportinherently includes having personnel perform the necessary activities.Under the current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement to havewritten procedures providing for posting bonds or securing guarantees ofsupport at andSection; 305.53(a) is a separate operational criterion whichmust be fully met as a condition of substantial compliance and the requirementunder paragraph (b) to utilize such procedures is a separate functionalcriterion wherein the required procedures must be utilized in 75 percentof the cases reviewed. We propose to delete the operational criterion ascasework reviewed under the functional criterion will reveal the existenceof any procedural deficiencies. The separate functional criterion for utilizingprocedures would be consolidated as a subcriterion under the proposed criterionevaluating Enforcement. <ITAG tagnum="81">32. Making Information Available to Consumer Reporting Agencies </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.54 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for making information availableto consumer reporting agencies under andSection; 302.70(a)(7). We propose to revise andSection; 305.54 by consolidating the requirementat paragraph (a) to have written procedures for making information regardingthe amount of overdue support owed by an absent parent to consumer reportingagencies with the requirement at paragraph (b) to use such procedures.We are proposing this change because such procedures are not in and ofthemselves a substantive measure of State performance and need not be statedand reviewed separately. In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having personnel perform the specified functions as the requirementto utilize procedures inherently includes having personnel perform thenecessary activities. Under current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement to haveprocedures for informing consumer credit agencies of overdue support isa separate operational criterion which must be fully met as a conditionof substantial compliance and the requirement under paragraph (b) to utilizesuch procedures is a separate functional criterion wherein the requiredprocedures must be utilized in 75 percent of the cases reviewed. We proposeto delete the operational criterion as casework reviewed under the functionalcriterion for utilizing procedures would reveal any procedural deficiencies.The separate functional criterion for utilizing procedures for informingconsumer credit agencies of overdue support would be consolidated underthe proposed functional criterion evaluating Enforcement. <ITAG tagnum="81">33. Late Payment Fees </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.55 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the optional State plan provision for imposing late paymentfees on absent parents who owe overdue support under andSection; 302.75.We propose to revise andSection; 305.55 by consolidating the requirementat paragraph (a) to have written procedures providing for applying latepayment fees uniformly throughout the State with the requirement at paragraph(b) to use such procedures. We are proposing this change as proceduresare not in and of themselves a substantive measure of State performanceand need not be stated and reviewed separately. In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having personnel perform the specified functions as the requirementto utilize procedures inherently includes having personnel perform thenecessary activities. Under current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement to havewritten procedures for imposing late payment fees at andSection; 305.55 isa separate operational criterion which must be fully met as a conditionof substantial compliance and the requirement to utilize such proceduresis a separate functional criterion wherein the required procedures mustbe utilized in 75 percent of the cases reviewed. We propose to delete thefunctional criterion because a systemic review under the operational criterionevaluating Financial Accountability under andSection; 305.20(a), as proposed,would better identify widespread deficiencies in this area. <ITAG tagnum="81">34. Medical Support Enforcement </ITAG>Regulations at andSection; 305.56 provide subcriteria evaluated to determinecompliance with the State plan requirement for medical support enforcementunder andSection; 302.80.We propose to revise andSection; 305.56 by consolidating the requirementat paragraph (a) to have written procedures to secure medical support informationand secure and enforce medical support obligations with the requirementat paragraph (b) to use such procedures. We are proposing this change assuch procedures are not in and of themselves a substantive measure of Stateperformance and need not be stated and reviewed separately. In addition, we propose to delete the current requirement under paragraph(c) for having personnel perform the specified functions as the requirementto utilize procedures inherently includes having personnel perform thenecessary activities. We propose to add a new paragraph (b) which would require States to haveand utilize written procedures for notifying the State Medicaid agencywhen a new or modified order for support includes medical support and forproviding the information referred to at andSection; 306.50(a) to the StateMedicaid agency. We are proposing this change as the current criteria donot adequately measure State compliance with the requirements at andSection;andSection;306.50 and 306.51 for providing information to and communicating with theState Medicaid agency. Under current regulations at andSection; 305.20, the requirement for havingwritten procedures providing for medical support enforcement is a separateoperational subcriterion which must be fully met as a condition of substantialcompliance. The requirement to utilize such procedures is a separate functionalcriterion wherein the required procedures must be utilized in 75 percentof the cases reviewed. We propose to replace the operational criterioncurrently reviewed for medical support enforcement at andSection; 305.20(a)with the new subcriterion found under proposed paragraph (b). In addition,we propose to consolidate the separate functional criteria for utilizingprocedures to secure and enforce medical support obligations as subcriteriaunder the proposed criteria evaluating Establishing an Obligation and Enforcementunder andSection; 305.20(b). <ITAG tagnum="81">35. Prohibition From Retroactive Modification of Child Support Arrearages</ITAG>Although regulations prohibiting the retroactive modification of childsupport arrearages at proposed andSection; 305.57 have not been publishedin final yet, they will be by the time this proposal is published in final(see 52 FR 34689, September 14, 1987). Therefore, we are including referenceto andSection; 305.57 in this proposed regulation. Under proposed andSection;305.57, States must have written procedures prohibiting the retroactivemodification of child support arrearages. We propose to include this requirementas a functional subcriterion under the criterion evaluating Support Obligationsas proposed under andSection; 305.20(b). We are proposing to add this asa substantial compliance subcriterion because it is an important Stateplan requirement. <T3>Performance Indicator. </T3>Regulations at andSection; 305.98(a) providethree performance indicator components which were effective beginning withthe fiscal year 1986 audit period. Paragraph (b) provides four additionalindicator components which were effective beginning with the fiscal year1988 audit period. We propose to revise andSection; 305.98 by redesignatingcurrent paragraph (d) as paragraph (f) and adding a new paragraph (d) whichwould include the performance indicator components in paragraphs (a) and(b) and add two new performance indicator components. The proposed performanceindicator set forth in paragraph (d) would be effective beginning withthe Federal fiscal year beginning after publication of these regulationsin final form. We also propose to clarify in proposed paragraph (d) whetheror not interstate collections are included in the collection amounts andthat collections for a fiscal year will be used for purposes of computingthe indicator components.The first of the two proposed indicator components provided under andSection;305.98(d)(8) would be referred to as the Paternity Establishment Indicatorand is calculated by dividing the total number of paternities establishedby the IV-D agency during a fiscal year by the total number of births tounmarried women in the State during the calendar year 2 years earlier (asreported to the National Center for Health Statistics). For example, thenumber of paternities for FY 1989 would be divided by the number of birthsto unmarried women for calendar year 1987. The number of births to unmarriedwomen is not a perfect measure of the number of IV-D cases in which paternitymust be established. Clearly not all unmarried women will seek servicesfrom the IV-D agencies within two years following the birth. Some willcome immediately. Some will come at a later date. Some will never applyfor services. Nevertheless, we believe that it is the best indicator ofthe demand for paternity services that currently exists. Further, no Stateis required to establish paternity in all or even a majority of these cases.To achieve a passing score, a State need only establish a number of paternitiesequivalent to 25 percent of the births to unmarried women. To achieve themaximum score, a State need only establish a number of paternities equivalentto 55 percent of the births to unmarried women. We believe this indicator component is the best measure of the degree towhich States are establishing paternity in cases that require such services,given available data. However, we are committed to obtaining data on thenumber of children in IV-D cases born out of wedlock and on the numberof these children for whom paternity has been established. Further, oncethis data is available, we intend to substitute it in this indicator component.The new ratio would be equivalent to the Paternity Establishment Percentageas defined in Section 111 of the Family Support Act of 1988. This percentageis, for each State, the number of children in IV-D cases who are born outof wedlock for whom paternity has been established divided by the numberof children in IV-D cases who are born out of wedlock. A child who is receivingAFDC by reason of the death of a parent, or a child with respect to whoma mother is found to have good cause for refusing to cooperate in establishingor collecting support, is excluded from this equation. We note that, unlike the other indicator components which focus eitheron AFDC or non-AFDC services, the paternity indicator component is a cross-cuttingindicator component in which AFDC and non-AFDC paternities count equally.In 1985, there were 828,000 births to unmarried women. A majority of thesewomen do not go on AFDC immediately. From this perspective, we might expectthat there could be more non-AFDC than AFDC paternity establishments. However,in the past there have not been a large number of non-AFDC paternity establishments.But this is changing. Non-AFDC paternity establishments have increased125 percent in the four years from 1983 to 1987. Non-AFDC paternities nowcomprise over 17 percent of all paternities established under the IV-Dprogram (up from only 10 percent in 1983). In the future we expect thatpercentage to continue to increase. The second additional indicator component proposed under andSection; 305.98(d)(9)would be referred to as the Cost Avoidance Indicator and is calculatedby multiplying the non-AFDC collections in a fiscal year (excluding collectionsmade on behalf of other States) by 20 percent and dividing the result bythe total IV-A assistance payments (excluding payment to families withunemployed parents) plus the amount of food stamps and Medicaid paymentsfor these same families for the same fiscal year. The term cost avoidancerefers to the financial savings to the taxpayer that occur when a familyleaves public assistance, stays off assistance in the first instance orhas their assistance reduced due to child support collections. This proposed indicator component is based on recently completed research,performed by Advanced Sciences, Inc. Although this research was limitedin scope and based on all female-headed households (not just IV-D cases),it found that the cost avoidance associated with child support collectionswas considerable. It was estimated that there was $1 in AFDC, food stampand Medicaid costs avoided for every $5 in child support collections realizedfor families not receiving AFDC. In other words, there is 20 cents in costavoidance for every dollar of child support collected by the IV-D agencyon behalf of non-welfare families. The proposed indicator component wouldtake into account the amount of cost avoidance in a State relative to thecash and medical assistance and food stamps paid in the State. Although the research upon which this indicator component is based isa significant step forward in establishing actual welfare cost avoidanceattributable to non-AFDC collections, it is not the definitive work oncost avoidance. Although problems remain in defining a cost avoidance measure,we propose to include this indicator component at this time in order togive States the benefit of their efforts to increase cost avoidance andwill improve and revise this measure over time. Ideally, a cost avoidance indicator component would measure only thosecases in which the child support enforcement services actually made thedifference between a family receiving and not receiving AFDC, Medicaidand food stamps. Unfortunately it would require extensive data collectionto make this decision on a State by State basis. Instead we propose touse the average amount of cost avoidance per dollar of child support collected.We have set the standards for this indicator component so that States withvery large non-AFDC caseloads do not receive excessive credit and so thatStates with smaller non-AFDC caseloads are not penalized. A State can achievea passing score by achieving a level of cost avoidance equal to only 1.5percent of AFDC, food stamp and Medicaid payments in the State. In order to integrate the two additional indicator components proposed,with the seven indicator components currently in the regulation, we areproposing under paragraph (e) a new scoring system which would be effective,along with the new performance indicator, beginning with the Federal fiscalyear beginning after publication of this regulation in final form. Theproposed scoring system retains the 100-point scoring system, the equalweight for AFDC and non-AFDC indicator components, and the requirementthat States achieve a minimum score of 70. Under the proposed system, upto 20 points each would be given for the Paternity Establishment, the AFDCRecovery Rate, and the Cost Avoidance indicator components. Up to 10 pointseach would be given for the AFDC and non-AFDC Cost Effectiveness indicatorcomponents. Finally, up to 5 points each would be given for the four AccountsReceivable indicator components (for a total of 20 points). In all, upto 40 points would be given for AFDC-related indicator components; up to40 points for non-AFDC-related indicator components; and up to 20 pointsfor the cross-cutting paternity establishment indicator component. Thetables in proposed andSection; 305.98(e)(1) (i) through (ix) show the scoreswhich would be applied for different levels of performance on each performanceindicator component. The tables in subparagraphs (e)(1) (i) through (ix) are based on a computersimulation which showed the results which were obtained for alternativescoring systems. In developing the scoring tables, we looked at the performanceof each State relative to the other States and relative to the nationalaverages. Our purpose was not to develop scoring tables which were impossibleto meet or to develop scoring tables which every State currently met. Ratherour purpose was to develop individual scoring tables which were clearlyachievable, which accurately reflected a minimum level of acceptable performanceon each indicator component and which when taken together would definea minimum level of acceptable performance. We believe that the scoringtables, individually and taken together, meet these criteria. We note thata State need not attain a passing score on every indicator component. AState can make up, to a certain extent, its poor performance on one indicatorcomponent with above average performance on other indicator components. Proposed paragraph (e)(2) provides that a State's total score must equalor exceed 70 and includes three examples of the scores typical States wouldreceive under the proposed scoring system. The average score for the Stateswhich submitted complete data in fiscal year 1987 was 70. We believe thatthe proposed scoring system is a clear measure of the overall effectivenessof State child support enforcement programs and that a minimum score of70 is clearly achievable for an effective IV-D program. Using FY 1987 data for simulation purposes, 21 jurisdictions score 70or more. Of the remainder, 24 score between 50 and 69, meaning that theycan realize a passing grade with, in many instances, little effort. Further,5 of the 9 other failing jurisdictions are hampered by missing data, forwhich they get a zero score. Table 1 shows the individual scores on each performance indicator componentand the total audit score a State would receive in fiscal year 1989 ifit were to achieve the fiscal year 1987 national average on each of theperformance indicator components.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s10,10,8</C><T4> Table 1</T4> <H1>Performance indicator </H1><H1>FY1987 national average </H1><H1>Audit score</H1><ITAG tagnum="1"> 1. AFDC cost effectiveness (CE) ratio <D>$1.38 </D><D>7</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 2. Non-AFDC CE ratio <D>$2.61 </D><D>7</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 3. AFDC recovery rate <D>\1\ 9.2 </D><D>14</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 4. AFDC current accounts receivable <D>\1\ 39.2 </D><D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 5. Non-AFDC current accounts receivable <D>\1\ 55.0 </D><D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 6. AFDC past due accounts receivable <D>\1\ 6.7 </D><D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 7. Non-AFDC past due accounts receivable <D>\1\ 9.8 </D><D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 8. Paternity establishment <D>\1\ 32.5 </D><D>14</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 9. Cost avoidance <D>\1\ 1.7 </D><D>14</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4"> Total audit score <D> </D><D>70</D><F>\1\ Percent.</F></ITAG></ITAG> Table 2 shows the total audit scores which each State would receive ifthe proposed scoring system were applied to fiscal year 1987 data. Notethat States marked with an asterisk are States for which complete fiscalyear 1987 data were not available. When data were not available on anyparticular performance indicator component, the States were given no pointsfor that indicator component.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L1,i1,s10,8</C><T4> Table</T4> 2<H1> State</H1><H1> Total audit score</H1><ITAG tagnum="1"> Alabama <D>79</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Alaska <D>65</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Arizona <D>52</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Arkansas <D>76 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> California <D>56 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Colorado <D>51 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Connecticut <D>79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Delaware <D>71 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> D.C. <D>28 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Florida <D>56 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Georgia <D>72 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Guam <D>32 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Hawaii <D>55 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Idaho <D>82 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Illinois <D>51 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Indiana <D>58 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Iowa <D>79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Kansas <D>52 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Kentucky <D>54 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Louisiana <D>53 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Maine <D>66 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Maryland <D>58 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Massachusetts <D>75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Michigan <D>92 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Minnesota <D>83 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Mississippi <D>50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Missouri <D>79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Montana <D>40 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Nebraska <D>60 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Nevada <D>69 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> New Hampshire <D>76 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> New Jersey <D>87 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> New Mexico <D>29 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> New York <D>49 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> North Carolina <D>85 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> North Dakota <D>79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Ohio <D>71 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Oklahoma <D>38 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Oregon <D>80 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Pennsylvania <D>85 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Puerto Rico <D>50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Rhode Island <D>61 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> South Carolina <D>64 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> South Dakota <D>67 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Tennessee <D>73 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Texas <D>33 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Utah <D>75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Vermont <D>62 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Virgin Islands <D>48 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Virginia <D>53 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Washington <D>63 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> West Virginia <D>35 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Wisconsin <D>74 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> Wyoming <D>52</D></ITAG></ITAG>Data used to compute the performance indicator components related to accountsreceivable have been required to be reported to OCSE since FY 1986. Reportingby the States to date has been incomplete and, in some cases, clearly inaccurate.For instance, there have been substantial discrepancies between collectionsreported on the OCSE-56 and the same collections reported on the OCSE 41.In addition, some States have reported identical data year after year.For purposes of assigning score values to the accounts receivable performanceindicator components or to any other performance indicator component, azero value will be assigned when a State fails to report data requiredor when the data a State reports is clearly erroneous on its face. Accuracyand reliability of data reported and used to construct the performanceindicator will be evaluated as part of the complete audit conducted ofall States which fail to achieve a passing score on the performance indicator.An estimate, if possible, will be made as part of the audit for any performanceindicator component which received a zero score as the result of no datareported or reported data that on its face is found to be erroneous. The new performance indicator components as well as the proposed scoringsystem would be effective for the fiscal year beginning after publicationof these proposed regulations as final regulations, allowing even moretime for program improvement. States have had ample time to implement requirementsthat have been in effect since the inception of the program in 1975, aswell as those enacted as part of the 1984 Child Support Enforcement Amendments.In addition, it should be noted that States have already shown improvementunder the current performance indicator components. When first published,using FY 1983 data, the current scoring system showed 18 States as failingthe 70 percent standard. However, experience for FY 1986, the initial yearof applicability, indicated only three failures. Further, because childsupport data processing systems, funded at enhanced matching rates or otherwise,will be operational in increasing numbers of States, program performanceand reporting capabilities will improve. Again, we feel any State withan effective program should be able to meet the 70 percent standard. In addition, we propose to revise current paragraph (d) (which would beredesignated as paragragh (f)) by replacing the provision that a performanceindicator scoring system will be described and updated by regulation everytwo years with a provision that the performance indicator scoring systemwill be described and updated by the Office in instructions. The scoring system will be updated from time to time as necessitated bychanging expectations. Changes in the scoring system will reflect progressmade by the States in improving program performance. Scoring system revisionswill be based on the actual performance of States with respect to indicatorcomponents. A passing score of 70 points will be retained. We will makeany changes to the scoring system available to States for comment and willpublish any changes in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>in advance of their effective date.Notice and Corrective Action PeriodWe propose to make a technical change to andSection; 305.99(b)(2) by replacingthe reference to andSection; 305.20 (a)(2), (b)(2) or (c)(2) with andSection;305.20(b). This change is consistent with the proposed changes to andSection;305.20. In addition, we propose to amend paragraph (d)(1) to make a correctionby replacing the word ``maintain'' where it appears, with the word ``maintained.''For clarity, we propose to add at the beginning of paragraph (d)(2), ``duringthe corrective action period.'' Finally, in paragraph (d)(3), we proposeto replace ``quarter'' with ``three-month period''; to insert ``first full''before ``fiscal'' where it first appears; and, to delete the word ``fiscal''where it last appears. These changes are being proposed to correspond withthe changes proposed to section andSection; 305.11, Audit period. Penalty for Failure to Have an Effective Program We propose to make a technical correction to andSection; 305.100(d) by replacingthe word ``and'' where it appears after the word ``notice'' and beforethe word ``maintain'' with the word ``or.'' <ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>This rule does not require any information collection activities and, therefore,no approvals are necessary under the Paperwork Reduction Act. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Impact Analysis </ITAG>The Secretary has determined, in accordance with Executive Order 12291that this rule does not constitute a ``major'' rule. A major rule is onethat is likely to result in: (1) An annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more; (2) A major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individual industries,Federal, State, or local government agencies, or geographic regions; or(3) Significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.The Executive Order requires that, for major rules, we prepare a regulatoryimpact analysis which describes the potential benefits and costs of therule, together with the potential benefits and costs of any alternativeapproaches. This proposed rule will have little or no net economic effect,because it will not change the requirements of State Child Support Enforcementprograms or the penalties which may be levied against programs which failto substantially comply with the requirements. The net effect here is noton actual State program practices but rather, on how these practices willbe evaluated. The number of States failing the audit is not expected toincrease under this proposed rule, even with the inclusion of the proposedperformance indicator components. The performance indicator is just oneaspect of the program audit and, if a State were to fail to meet the performanceindicator, it is likely that it would fail other aspects of the audit aswell. Under the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (Pub. L. 96-354), we are requiredto prepare a regulatory flexibility analysis for those rules which willhave a significant economic impact on a substantial number of small entities.This proposed rule will not have a significant economic impact on a substantialnumber of small entities and, therefore, a regulatory flexibility analysisis not required. The only expected economic impact is comparatively smallFederal savings as a result of reduced manhours per State audit. <ITAG tagnum="85">List of Subjects in 45 CFR Part 305 </ITAG>Accounting, Child support, Grant programs/social programs, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Program No. 13.783, ChildSupport Enforcement Program)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated June 7, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Wayne A. Stanton, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Director, Office of Child Support Enforcement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: December 16, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Otis R. Bowen, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, 45 CFR Part 305 is proposed tobe amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 305_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 305 continues to read as set forth below:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 603(h), 604(d), 651(a) (1) and (4), and 1302.</ITAG>2. Section 305.11 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Audit period. </ITAG>The audit will cover a period comprised of not more than 12 nor less thanthree consecutive months. When the State is operating under a correctiveaction plan, the review will cover the first three-month period beginningafter the corrective action period. When the State fails to meet auditcriteria related to the performance indicator, the review will cover thefirst full fiscal year following the date on which a determination wasmade that performance was not in substantial compliance. The audit may,at State request, be conducted prior to the end of the one-year periodprescribed under andSection; 305.10(b) of this part when the State is beingpenalized under andSection; 305.100 of this part. 3. Section 305.12 is amended by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State comments. </ITAG>(a) Prior to the start of the actual audit, the Office will hold an auditentrance conference with the IV-D agency. At that conference the Officewill explain how the audit will be performed and make any necessary arrangements.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>4. Section 305.13 is amended by revising paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State cooperation in annual audit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section will necessitatea finding that the State has failed to substantially comply. 5. Section 305.20 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effective support enforcement program. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part and section 403(h) of the Act, in order tobe found to have an effective program in substantial compliance with therequirements of title IV-D of the Act, a State must meet the IV-D Stateplan requirements contained in Part 302 of this chapter measured as follows:(a) For audits conducted for any period beginning after [Insert Date FinalRegulation is Published], the following audit criteria must be fully met:(1) State cooperation. (45 CFR 305.13) (2) Statewide operation. (45 CFR 305.21 (a) and (c), 305.34 and 305.44)(3) Single and separate organizational unit. (45 CFR 305.23) (4) Reports and maintenance of records. (45 CFR 305.35) (5) Financial accountability. (45 CFR 305.36, 305.37, 305.38, 305.46 andcollection and reporting of fees and interest (including as appropriate,those provided under 45 CFR 303.69(e), 303.72(i), 303.100 (d)(1)(iii) and(e)(3), 303.102(f), 303.105(c), 305.31(b), 305.33(b), 305.48(b)(3), and305.55)) (6) Medical support. (45 CFR 305.56(b)) (7) Child support guidelines. (45 CFR 305.47) (8) Expedited processes. (45 CFR 305.50) (9) Interstate cooperation. (45 CFR 305.32 (a) and (f) through (h)) (10) Continuation of services. (45 CFR 305.31(c)) (b) For audits conducted for any period beginning after [Insert Date FinalRegulation is Published], the procedures required by the following auditcriteria must be used in 75 percent of the cases reviewed for each criterion:(1) Establishing paternity. (45 CFR 305.24, 305.32(c) and 305.33(c)) (2) Support obligations. (45 CFR 305.25, 305.32(d), 305.33(c), 305.56(a)and 305.57) (3) Enforcement of support obligations. (Providing enforcement servicesunder 45 CFR 305.26 (a), (b) and (c), 305.32(e), 305.33(c), 305.42, 305.54,305.56(a) and, when appropriate, use of one or more of the specializedenforcement techniques under 45 CFR 305.39 (b), (c), (d), and (e), 305.40,305.51, 305.52 and 305.53) (4) Collection/Distribution. (45 CFR 305.27, 305.28, 305.29, 305.32(e),305.41, 305.45(a) and 305.48 (a) and (b) (1) and (2))(5) Wage or income withholding. (45 CFR 305.49) (c) Beginning in [Insert Fiscal Year Beginning After Publication of FinalRegulation], the criteria referred to in andSection; 305.98 (e) and (f) ofthis part relating to the performance indicator prescribed in paragraph(d) of that section must be met. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>6. Section 305.21 is amended by removing paragraph (b) and redesignatingparagraphs (c) and (d) as paragraphs (b) and (c). 7. Section 305.22 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.22 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State financial participation. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, in order to be found to be in compliancewith the State plan requirement for State financial participation (45 CFR302.11), a State must participate financially by incurring the applicableState share of the program's administrative costs with funds which areappropriated to the IV-D agency or transferred to the IV-D agency, or certifiedby the contributing public agency as representing expenditures under theState's IV-D plan.8. Section 305.23 is amended by revising paragraph (a) and (b) and removingparagraph (c) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Single and separate organizational unit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(a) Is responsible and accountable for the operation of the IV-D plan;and(b) Is responsible for securing compliance with requirements of the IV-Dplan delegated to any other State or local agency or official performedunder cooperative agreement or purchase of service agreement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>9. Section 305.24 is amended by adding the word ``and'' after the semicolonin paragraph (a) and removing paragraphs (c) through (g). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>10. Section 305.25 is amended by replacing the colon at the end of paragraph(a) with ``; and'', removing subparagraphs (a) (1) and (2), removing paragraphs(c) and (d) and changing the semicolon to a period at the end of paragraph(b). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>11. Section 305.26 is amended by removing ``identified and'' and adding``and be utilizing'' after ``established'' in the beginning of paragraph(c), adding the word ``and'' after the semicolon at the end of paragraph(c), replacing the semicolon at the end of paragraph (d) with a periodand removing paragraphs (e) through (g). 12. Section 305.27 is amended by revising paragraph (a), removing paragraphs(b) and (e), and redesignating and revising paragraphs (c) and (d) as paragraphs(b) and (c), respectively, to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.27 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Support payments to the IV-D agency. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(a) Have established and be utilizing written procedures for the receiptof support payments by the IV-D agency; (b) Have established and be utilizing written procedures to identify supportpayments that are not being received by the IV-D agency and to take correctiveaction; and (c) Have established and be utilizing written procedures that meet therequirements of andSection; 302.32(b) of this chapter for informing the State'sIV-A agency of the amounts of collection so that the family's continuedeligibility for assistance payments can be determined. 13. Section 305.28 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.28 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Distribution of support payment. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, in order to be found to be in compliancewith the State plan requirements for distribution of support collections(45 CFR 302.51, 302.52 and 302.32), a State must have and utilize writtenprocedures which, if properly applied, would result in a distribution ofsupport collections which is in accordance with andSection;andSection; 302.51,302.52 and 302.32 of this chapter. 14. Section 305.31 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.31 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Individuals not otherwise eligible.</ITAG>For the purposes of this part, in order to be found to be in compliancewith the State plan requirement for providing support enforcement servicesto individuals not otherwise eligible (45 CFR 302.33 and 302.51(e)), aState must: (a) Have established and be utilizing written procedures for acceptingsigned, written applications on a Statewide basis for support servicesfrom individuals not otherwise eligible under andSection; 302.31 of thischapter; (b) Have established and be utilizing written procedures for collectionof any fees and recovery of any costs authorized by the State's plan; and(c) Have established and be utilizing procedures for providing servicesto former AFDC recipients in accordance with andSection; 302.51(e) of thischapter. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>15. Section 305.32 is amended by adding the word ``and'' at the end ofparagraph (g), replacing the semicolon with a period at the end of paragraph(h) and removing paragraphs (i) and (j). 16. Section 305.33 is amended by revising paragraph (a), removing paragraph(b) through (e), redesignating and revising paragraph (f) as paragraph(b), and redesignating paragraph (g) as paragraph (c) and revising it toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State parent locator service. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(a) Have established and be utilizing a central State PLS office as requiredby andSection; 302.35 (a) and (c) of this chapter; (b) Have established and be utilizing written procedures for collectingany fees required by andSection; 303.70(e)(2) of this chapter and the State'splan; and (c) Have established and be using the names and other identifying informationof absent parents, the State and local locate data sources, such as thoselisted in andSection; 303.3 of this chapter, and the Federal PLS, in an attemptto determine the actual whereabouts of the absent parent, or determinethat the whereabouts of the absent parent cannot be ascertained. 17. Section 305.35 is amended by removing paragraph (c), redesignatingand revising paragraph (b) as paragraph (c), and adding a new paragraph(b) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reports and maintenance of records. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) Have established and be utilizing procedures for establishing and maintainingcase file records containing all information pertaining to the case, inaccordance with andSection; 303.2; and (c) Have established and be utilizing a system for insuring that reportsrequired by the Secretary are provided when due, and are accurate and complete.18. Section 305.36 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.36</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fiscal policies and accountability. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, in order to be found in compliance withthe State plan requirement for fiscal policies and accountability (45 CFR302.14), a State must have established and be maintaining and utilizingan accounting system and supporting fiscal records that assure that claimsfor Federal funds are in accord with applicable Federal regulations andinstructions issued by the Office. 19. Section 305.37 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bonding of employees. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for bonding of employees (45 CFR 302.19), a State mustensure that every person, including the individuals prescribed in andSection;302.19(b) of this chapter, who, as a regular part of his or her employment,receives, disburses, handles or has access to or control over funds collectedunder the Child Support Enforcement program is covered by a bond in anamount which the State IV-D agency deems adequate to indemnify the StateIV-D program for loss resulting from employee dishonesty. 20. Section 305.38 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.38</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Separation of cash handling and accounting functions. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for the separation of cash handling and accounting functions(45 CFR 302.20), a State must ensure that persons, including the individualsspecified in andSection; 302.20(b) of this chapter, responsible for handlingcash receipts of support do not participate in accounting or operatingfunctions which would permit them to conceal in the accounting recordsthe misuse of support receipts, except with respect to sparsely populatedgeographic areas within the State granted a waiver under andSection; 302.20(c)of this chapter by the Regional Office. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.39</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>21. Section 305.39 is amended by adding the words ``and utilize'' afterthe word ``Have'' in paragraphs (b) through (h), removing paragraphs (i)and (j), replacing the semicolon at the end of paragraph (g) with ``, and''and replacing the semicolon at the end of paragraph (h) with a period.22. Section 305.40 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Federal tax refund offset. </ITAG>For the purpose of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for Federal tax refund offset (45 CFR 302.60), a Statemust have and utilize written procedures to obtain payment of past-duesupport from Federal tax refunds in accordance with section 464 of theAct and andSection; 303.72 of this chapter and regulations of the InternalRevenue Service at 26 CFR 301.6402-5.23. Section 305.41 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Recovery of direct payments. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for recovery of direct payments (45 CFR 302.31(a)), aState must have and utilize written procedures to: (a) Notify the IV-A agency whenever a determination is made that directlyreceived payments have been retained, if the State elects the IV-A recoverymethod; or (b) Recover retained direct support payments in accordance with the standardsin andSection; 303.80 of this chapter if the State elects the IV-D recoverymethod. 24. Section 305.42 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Spousal support. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan provision for the collection of spousal support (45 CFR 302.31(a)),a State must have and utilize written procedures for the collection ofspousal support from a legally liable person when: (a) A support order has been established for the spouse; (b) The spouse or former spouse is living with the child(ren) for whomthe individual is liable for child support; and (c) The support order established for the child(ren) is being enforcedunder the IV-D plan. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>25. Section 305.44 is amended by replacing the period at the end of theintroductory language with a colon. 26. Section 305.45 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of collection of assigned support. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for providing notice of collection of assigned support(45 CFR 302.54), a State must have and utilize written procedures for:(a) Sending, at least annually, with respect to those cases where thereis a support order, or, in the absence of an order, voluntary support paymentshave been made, a notice of the amount of support payments collected duringthe past year to individuals who have assigned rights to support underandSection; 232.11 of this title; (b) Listing separately in the notice support payments collected from eachabsent parent when more than one absent parent owes support to the family;and (c) Indicating in the notice the amount of support collected which waspaid to the family. 27. Section 305.46 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.46</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incentive payments to States and political subdivisions. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for incentive payments to States and political subdivisions(45 CFR 302.55), the State must have and utilize written procedures torequire that if one or more political subdivisions of the State participatein the costs of carrying out the activities under the State plan duringany period, each such subdivision shall be paid an appropriate share ofany incentive payments made to the State for such period, as determinedby the State in accordance with andSection; 303.52(d) of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.48</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>28. Section 305.48 is amended by adding ``and utilize'' after the word``Have'' in paragraphs (a) and (b), adding ``and'' after the semicolonat the end of paragraph (a), replacing the semicolon with a period at theend of paragraph (b)(3) and removing paragraphs (c) and (d). 29. Section 305.49 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.49 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Wage or income withholding. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for wage or income withholding (45 CFR 302.70(a)(1)),a State must have and utilize written procedures for carrying out a programof withholding in accordance with andSection; 303.100 of this chapter. 30. Section 305.50 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Expedited processes. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for expedited processes (45 CFR 302.70(a)(2)), a Statemust have and utilize written expedited procedures to establish and enforcechild support obligations having the same force and effect as those establishedthrough full judicial process in accordance with andSection; 303.101 of thischapter. 31. Section 305.51 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Collection of overdue support by State income tax refund offset. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for collection of overdue support by State income taxrefund offset (45 CFR 302.70(a)(3)), a State must have and utilize writtenprocedures for obtaining overdue support from State income tax refundsin accordance with andSection; 303.102 of this chapter. 32. Section 305.52 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.52 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Imposition of liens against real and personal property. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for the imposition of liens against real and personalproperty (45 CFR 302.70(a)(4)), a State must have and utilize written proceduresfor the imposition of liens against the real and personal property of absentparents who owe overdue support in accordance with andSection; 303.103 ofthis chapter. 33. Section 305.53 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.53 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Posting security, bond or guarantee to secure payment of overdue support.</ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for posting security, bond or guarantee to secure paymentof overdue support (45 CFR 302.70(a)(6)), a State must have and utilizewritten procedures which require that an absent parent give security, posta bond or give some other guarantee to secure payment of support in accordancewith andSection; 303.104 of this chapter. 34. Section 305.54 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.54 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Making information available to consumer reporting agencies. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for making information available to consumer reportingagencies (45 CFR 302.70(a)(7)), a State must have and utilize written proceduresfor making information regarding the amount of overdue support owed byan absent parent available to consumer reporting agencies in accordancewith andSection; 303.105 of this chapter. 35. Section 305.55 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.55 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Imposition of late payment fees on absent parents who owe overduesupport. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the optionalState plan provision for imposing late payment fees on absent parents whoowe overdue support (45 CFR 302.75), a State must have and utilize writtenprocedures for uniformly applying the late payment fee in accordance withandSection; 302.75 of this chapter. 36. Section 305.56 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.56 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Medical support enforcement. </ITAG>For the purposes of this part, to be found in compliance with the Stateplan requirement for medical support enforcement (45 CFR 302.80), a Statemust: (a) Have and utilize written procedures to secure medical support informationand secure and enforce medical support obligations in accordance with 45CFR Part 306 Subpart B of this chapter; and (b) Have and utilize written procedures for notifying the State Medicaidagency when a new or modified order for support includes medical supportand for providing the information referred to at andSection; 306.50(a) tothe State Medicaid agency when available. 37. Section 305.98 is amended by revising paragraph (d) and redesignatingit as paragraph (f) and adding new paragraphs (d) and (e) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.98 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Performance indicator and audit criteria. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) Beginning in [Insert Fiscal Year Beginning After Publication of FinalRegulation], the Office will use the following performance indicator componentsin determining whether each State has an effective IV-D program: (1) AFDC IV-D collections for a fiscal year (including collections madeon behalf of other States) divided by total IV-D expenditures for the samefiscal year (less laboratory cost incurred in determining paternity atState option); (2) Non-AFDC IV-D collections for a fiscal year (including collectionsmade on behalf of other States) divided by total IV-D expenditures forthe same fiscal year (less laboratory cost incurred in determining paternityat State option); (3) AFDC IV-D collections for a fiscal year (excluding collections madeon behalf of other States) divided by IV-A assistance payments for thesame fiscal year (less payments to unemployed parents); (4) AFDC IV-D collections for a fiscal year (including collections madeon behalf of other States) on support due for the same fiscal year dividedby total AFDC support due for the same fiscal year; (5) Non-AFDC IV-D collections for a fiscal year (including collectionsmade on behalf of other States) on support due for the same fiscal yeardivided by total non-AFDC support due for the same fiscal year; (6) AFDC IV-D collections for a fiscal year (including collections madeon behalf of other States) on support due for prior periods divided bytotal AFDC support due for the same prior periods; (7) Non-AFDC IV-D collections for a fiscal year (including collectionsmade on behalf of other States) on support due for prior periods dividedby total non-AFDC support due for the same prior periods; (8) The number of paternities established by the State during a fiscalyear divided by the total number of births to unmarried women in the Statefor the calendar year two years prior to the fiscal year (for example,the number of paternities esbtablished by the State during FY 1986 (October1, 1985-September 30, 1986) divided by the total number of births to unmarriedwomen in the State for calendar year 1984 (January 1-December 30, 1984));and (9) Non-AFDC IV-D collections for a fiscal year (excluding collectionsmade on behalf of other States) multiplied by .2 and divided by the totalIV-A assistance payments (less payments to unemployed parents) plus FoodStamps and Medicaid payments to the same families for the same fiscal year. (e) Beginning in [insert fiscal year beginning after  publication of finalregulation], the Office shall use the following procedures and audit criteriato measure State performance: (1) The ratio for each of the performance indicator components in paragraph(d) of this section will be evaluated on the basis of the scores in thetables in paragraphs (e)(1) (i) through (ix) of this section. The tablesshow the scores the States will receive for different levels of performance. (i) The ratio provided under paragraph (d)(1) measuring AFDC cost effectiveness.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,6</C> <H1> </H1><H1>,</H1> Level of performance: <D>Score</D><ITAG tagnum="2">Less than $.20 <D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $.20 but less than $.40 <D>1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $.40 but less than $.60 <D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $.60 but less than $.80 <D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $.80 but less than $1.00 <D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $l.00 but less than $1.20 <D>5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $1.20 but less than $1.30 <D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $1.30 but less than $1.40 <D>7 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $1.40 but less than $1.50 <D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $1.50 but less than $1.60 <D>9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">$1.60 or more <D>10</D></ITAG></ITAG> (ii) The ratio provided under paragraph (d)(2) measuring non-AFDC costeffectiveness.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,6</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1>Level of performance: <D>Score </D><ITAG tagnum="2">Less than $.20 <D>0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $.20 but less than $.60 <D>1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $.60 but less than $1.00 <D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $1.00 but less than $1.40 <D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $1.40 but less than $1.80 <D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $1.80 but less than $2.10 <D>5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $2.10 but less than $2.40 <D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $2.40 but less than $2.70 <D>7 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $2.70 but less than $3.00 <D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least $3.00 but less than $3.30 <D>9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">$3.30 or more <D>10</D></ITAG></ITAG>(iii) The percentage provided under paragraph (d)(3) measuring AFDC recovery.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,6 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> Level of performance (in percent):<D>Score </D><ITAG tagnum="2">Less than 3% <D>0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 3% but less than 4% <D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 4% but less than 5% <D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 5% but less than 6% <D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 6% but less than 7% <D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 7% but less than 8% <D>10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 8% but less than 9% <D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 9% but less than 10% <D>14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 10% but less than 12% <D>16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 12% but less than 14% <D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">14% or more <D>20</D></ITAG></ITAG> (iv) The percentage provided under paragraph (d)(4) measuring AFDC currentaccounts receivable. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,6 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> Level of performance:<D>Score </D><ITAG tagnum="2">Less than 5% <D>0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 5% but less than 15% <D>1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 15% but less than 25% <D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 25% but less than 35% <D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 35% but less than 45% <D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">45% or more <D>5</D></ITAG></ITAG> (v) The percentage provided under paragraph (d)(5) measuring non-AFDC currentaccounts receivable. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,6 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> Level of performance:<D>Score </D><ITAG tagnum="2">Less than 20% <D>0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 20% but less than 30% <D>l </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 30% but less than 40% <D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 40% but less than 50% <D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 50% but less than 60% <D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">60% or more <D>5</D></ITAG></ITAG> (vi) The percentage provided under paragraph (d)(6) measuring AFDC pastdue accounts receivable. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,6 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> Level of performance: <D>Score </D><ITAG tagnum="2">Less than 2% <D>0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 2% but less than 4% <D>l </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 4% but less than 6% <D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 6% but less than 8% <D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 8% but less than 10% <D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">10% or more <D>5</D></ITAG></ITAG> (vii) The percentage provided under paragraph (d)(7) measuring non-AFDCpast due accounts receivable. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,6 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> Level of performance: <D>Score </D><ITAG tagnum="2">Less than 4% <D>0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 4% but less than 6%<D>1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 6% but less than 8% <D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 8% but less than 10% <D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 10% but less than 12% <D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">12% or more <D>5</D></ITAG></ITAG> (viii) The percentage provided under paragraph (d)(8) measuring paternityestablishment. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,6 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> Level of performance: <D>Score </D><ITAG tagnum="2">Less than 2% <D>0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 2% but less than 4% <D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 4% but less than 8% <D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 8% but less than 12% <D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 12% but less than 16% <D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 16% but less than 20% <D>10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 20% but less than 25% <D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 25% but less than 35% <D>14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 35% but less than 45% <D>16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 45% but less than 55% <D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">55% or more <D>20</D></ITAG></ITAG> (ix) The percentage provided under paragraph (d)(9) measuring cost avoidance.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,6 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> Level of performance: <D>Score </D><ITAG tagnum="2">Less than .25% <D>0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least .25% but less than .5% <D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least .5% but less than .75% <D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least .75% but less than 1.0% <D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 1.0% but less than 1.25% <D>10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 1.25% but less than 1.5% <D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 1.5% but less than 2.0% <D>14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 2.0% but less than 3.0% <D>16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At least 3.0% but less than 4.0% <D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">4.0% or more <D>20</D></ITAG></ITAG> (2) To be found to meet the audit criteria, a State's total score mustequal or exceed 70.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Examples. </T4>The following tables show how typical States would bejudged under the performance indicator components listed in paragraphs(d)(1) through (9).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>State A </T4><H1>Indicator </H1><H1>Level of performance </H1><H1>Score</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">1. AFDC cost effectiveness (CE) ratio <D>$1.15 </D><D>5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Non-AFDC CE ratio <D>$1.45 </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. AFDC recovery rate <D>\1\ 21 </D><D>20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. AFDC current accounts receivable <D>\1\ 26 </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Non-AFDC current accounts receivable <D>\1\ 25 </D><D>1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. AFDC past due accounts receivable <D>\1\ 11 </D><D>5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7. Non-AFDC past due accounts receivable <D>\1\ 20 </D><D>5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8. Paternity indicator <D>\1\ 46 </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9. Cost avoidance indicator <D>\1\ 5.5 </D><D>20</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total audit score (points) <D/><D>82 </D><F>\1\ Percent.</F></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s10,10,8 </C><T4>State B </T4><H1>Indicator </H1><H1>Level of performance </H1><H1>Score</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">1. AFDC CE ratio <D>$2.65 </D><D>20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Non-AFDC CE ratio <D>$2.75 </D><D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. AFDC recovery rate <D>\1\ 7.5 </D><D>10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. AFDC current accounts receivable <D>\1\ 27 </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Non-AFDC current accounts receivable <D>\1\ 42 </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. AFDC past due accounts receivable <D>\1\ 6.5 </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7. Non-AFDC past due accounts receivable <D>\1\ 9 </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8. Paternity indicator <D>\1\ 56 </D><D>20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9. Cost avoidance indicator <D>\1\ 1.2 </D><D>10</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total audit score (points)<D> </D><D>70 </D><F>\1\ Percent.</F></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s10,10,8 </C><T4>State C </T4><H1>Indicator </H1><H1>Level of performance </H1><H1>Score</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">1. AFDC CE ratio <D>$0.85 </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Non-AFDC CE ratio <D>$2.45 </D><D>7 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. AFDC recovery rate <D>\1\ 5.5 </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. AFDC current accounts receivable <D>\1\ 38 </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Non-AFDC current accounts receivable <D>\1\ 59 </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. AFDC past due accounts receivable <D>\1\ 5 </D><D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7. Non-AFDC past due accounts receivable <D>\1\ 9 </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8. Paternity indicator <D>\1\ 10 </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9. Cost avoidance indicator <D>\1\ 3.5 </D><D>18</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total audit score (points) <D/><D>54 </D><F>\1\ Percent.</F></ITAG></ITAG>  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">In the above examples, State A would meet the audit criterion becauseit received a total audit score of 82; State B would also meet the auditcriterion because it had a total audit score of 70; State C would not meetthe audit criterion because it had achieved a score of only 54. (f) The scoring system provided in paragraph (e) of this section will bedescribed and updated periodically by the Office in instructions. 38. Section 305.99 is amended by revising paragraph (b)(2), and paragraphs(d) (1), (2) and (3) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.99 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice and corrective action period. </ITAG>(a) * * * (b) * * * (2) Identify any audit criteria listed in andSection; 305.20(b) of this partthat the State met only marginally (that is, in 75 to 80 percent of thecases reviewed); <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) * * * (1) The State has achieved substantial compliance with the unmet criteriacited in the notice and maintained substantial compliance with any marginally-metcriteria cited in the notice; (2) During the corrective action period, the State is not implementingits corrective action plan; or (3) The State has implemented its corrective action plan but has failedto achieve substantial compliance with the unmet criteria cited in thenotice and maintain substantial compliance with any marginally-met criteriacited in the notice. For State plan-related criteria, this determinationwill be made as of the first full three-month period after the correctiveaction period. For performance related criteria, this determination willbe made as of the first full fiscal year following the year in which adetermination was made that performance was not in substantial compliance.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 305.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>39. Section 305.100 is amended by replacing the word ``and'' with the word``or'' in paragraph (d).<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-1605 Filed 1-30-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4150-04-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>